Nebraska, session 109, LB181.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB181 LB181
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 4-110, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
4-110 Verification of lawful presence in the United States pursuant
to section 4-108 is not required for:
(1) Any purpose for which lawful presence in the United States is
not restricted by law, ordinance, or regulation;
(2) Assistance for health care services and products, not related to
an organ transplant procedure, that are necessary for the treatment of an
emergency medical condition, including emergency labor and delivery,
manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity, including
severe pain, such that the absence of immediate medical attention could
reasonably be expected to result in (a) placing the patient's health in
serious jeopardy, (b) serious impairment to bodily functions, or (c)
serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part;
(3) Short-term, noncash, in-kind emergency disaster relief;
(4) Public health assistance for immunizations with respect to
diseases and for testing and treatment of symptoms of communicable
diseases, whether or not such symptoms are caused by a communicable
disease; or
(5) Programs, services, or assistance necessary for the protection
of life or safety, such as soup kitchens, crisis counseling and
intervention, and short-term shelter, which (a) deliver in-kind services
at the community level, including those which deliver such services
through public or private, nonprofit agencies and (b) do not condition
the provision of assistance, the amount of assistance provided, or the
cost of assistance provided on the income or resources of the recipient;
or .
(6) Participation in the bridge to independence program as provided
in the Young Adult Bridge to Independence Act.
The Legislature finds that unborn children do not have immigration
status and therefor are not within the scope of section 4-108. Prenatal
-2-

LB181 LB181
2025 2025
care services available pursuant to sections 68-915 and 68-972 to unborn
children, whose eligibility is independent of the mother's eligibility
status, shall not be deemed to be tied to the immigration status of the
mother and therefor are not included in the restrictions imposed by
section 4-108.
Sec. 2. Section 43-4501, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-4501 Sections 43-4501 to 43-4514 and section 3 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Young Adult Bridge to Independence Act.
Sec. 3. Services provided under the Young Adult Bridge to
Independence Act apply to young adults as described in section 43-4504
notwithstanding the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity
Reconciliation Act of 1996, Public Law 104-193, and other limitations on
an immigrant's ability to access public benefits, pursuant to the
authority provided in 8 U.S.C. 1621(d), as such section existed on
January 1, 2025. Beginning January 1, 2026, the bridge to independence
program shall be available to all young adults described in section
43-4504, including a young adult who is not lawfully present in the
United States.
Sec. 4. Section 43-4505, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-4505 Extended services and support provided under the bridge to
independence program include, but are not limited to:
(1) Medical care under the medical assistance program for young
adults who meet the eligibility requirements of section 43-4504 and have
signed a voluntary services and support agreement as provided in section
43-4506. Such medical care shall be provided notwithstanding the Personal
Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, Public
Law 104-193, and other limitations on an immigrant's ability to receive
public benefits, so that a young adult participating in the bridge to
independence program receives medical care under the medical assistance
-3-

LB181 LB181
2025 2025
program, whether or not such young adult is lawfully present. Medical
care shall be provided pursuant to Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal
Social Security Act. If a young adult is not eligible under either Title
XIX or Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act, the department shall
identify and pursue all other coverage options including, but not limited
to, payment from the General Fund;
(2) Medical care under the medical assistance program for young
adults who meet the eligibility requirements of subdivision (2)(c) of
section 43-4504, are eligible for a category of medical assistance
pursuant to section 68-915 or other medical assistance category under
federal law, and have signed a voluntary services and support agreement
as provided in section 43-4506;
(3) Housing, placement, and support in the form of foster care
maintenance payments which shall remain at least at the rate set
immediately prior to the young adult's exit from foster care. As decided
by and with the young adult, young adults may reside in a foster family
home, a supervised independent living setting, an institution, or a
foster care facility. Placement in an institution or a foster care
facility should occur only if necessary due to a young adult's
developmental level or medical condition. A young adult who is residing
in a foster care facility upon leaving foster care may choose to
temporarily stay until he or she is able to transition to a more age-
appropriate setting. For young adults residing in a supervised
independent living setting:
(a) The department may send all or part of the foster care
maintenance payments directly to the young adult. This should be decided
on a case-by-case basis by and with the young adult in a manner that
respects the independence of the young adult; and
(b) Rules and restrictions regarding housing options should be
respectful of the young adult's autonomy and developmental maturity.
Specifically, safety assessments of the living arrangements shall be age-
-4-

LB181 LB181
2025 2025
appropriate and consistent with federal guidance on a supervised setting
in which the individual lives independently. A clean background check
shall not be required for an individual residing in the same residence as
the young adult; and
(4) Case management services that are young-adult driven. Case
management shall be a continuation of the independent living transition
proposal in section 43-1311.03, including a written description of
additional resources that will help the young adult in creating permanent
relationships and preparing for the transition to adulthood and
independent living. Case management shall include the development of a
case plan, developed jointly by the department and the young adult, that
includes a description of the identified housing situation or living
arrangement, the resources to assist the young adult in the transition
from the bridge to independence program to adulthood, and the needs
listed in subsection (1) of section 43-1311.03. The case plan shall
incorporate the independent living transition proposal in section
43-1311.03. A new plan shall be developed for young adults who have no
previous independent living transition proposal. Case management shall
also include, but not be limited to, documentation that assistance has
been offered and provided that would help the young adult meet his or her
personal goals, if such assistance is appropriate and if the young adult
is eligible and consents to receive such assistance. This shall include,
but not be limited to, assisting the young adult to:
(a) Obtain employment or other financial support;
(b) Obtain a government-issued identification card;
(c) Open and maintain a bank account;
(d) Obtain appropriate community resources, including health, mental
health, developmental disability, and other disability services and
support;
(e) When appropriate, satisfy any juvenile justice system
requirements and assist with sealing the young adult's juvenile court
-5-

LB181 LB181
2025 2025
record if the young adult is eligible under section 43-2,108.01;
(f) Complete secondary education;
(g) Apply for admission and aid for postsecondary education or
vocational courses;
(h) Obtain the necessary state court findings and then apply for
special immigrant juvenile status as defined in 8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(27)(J)
or apply for other immigration relief that the young adult may be
eligible for;
(i) Create a health care power of attorney, health care proxy, or
other similar document recognized under state law, at the young adult's
option, pursuant to the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care
Act, Public Law 111-148;
(j) Obtain a copy of health and education records of the young
adult;
(k) Apply for any public benefits or benefits that the young adult
may be eligible for or may be due through his or her parents or
relatives, including, but not limited to, aid to dependent children,
supplemental security income, social security disability insurance,
social security survivors benefits, the Special Supplemental Nutrition
Program for Women, Infants, and Children, the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program, and low-income home energy assistance programs;
(l) Maintain relationships with individuals who are important to the
young adult, including searching for individuals with whom the young
adult has lost contact;
(m) Access information about maternal and paternal relatives,
including any siblings;
(n) Access young adult empowerment opportunities, such as Project
Everlast and peer support groups; and
(o) Access pregnancy and parenting resources and services.
Sec. 5. Section 43-4514, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
-6-

LB181 LB181
2025 2025
43-4514 (1) The department shall submit an amended state plan
amendment by October 1, 2023, to seek federal Title IV-E funding under 42
U.S.C. 672 for any newly eligible young adult who was adjudicated to be a
juvenile described in subdivision (1), (2), or (3)(b) of section 43-247
and who meets the requirements under subdivision (2)(c) of section
43-4504.
(2) The department shall implement the bridge to independence
program, extended guardianship assistance described in section 43-4511,
and extended adoption assistance described in section 43-4512 in
accordance with the federal Fostering Connections to Success and
Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008, 42 U.S.C. 673 and 42 U.S.C. 675(8)(B)
and in accordance with requirements necessary to obtain federal Title IV-
E funding under 42 U.S.C. 672 and 42 U.S.C. 673.
(3) On or before October 1, 2025, the department shall submit an
application to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to
amend the medicaid state plan to provide medical assistance to young
adults participating in the bridge to independence program who are
eligible for the medical assistance program and the federal Children's
Health Insurance Program, established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1397aa et
seq., including young adults less than twenty-one years of age and who
are not lawfully present in the United States.
(4) (3) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations as needed to carry out this section by October 1, 2025 July
1, 2024.
(5) Except as otherwise provided, all (4) All references to the
United States Code in the Young Adult Bridge to Independence Act refer to
sections of the code as such sections existed on January 1, 2025 2015.
Sec. 6. Original sections 4-110 and 43-4501, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 43-4505 and 43-4514, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-7-